Utah statutes.
10-3-705.   Requirements as to form -- Effective date.
Ordinances passed or enacted by the governing body shall be signed by the
mayor, or if he is absent, by the mayor pro tempore, or by a quorum of the
governing body, and shall be recorded before taking effect. No ordinance shall
be void or unlawful by reason of its failure to conform to the provisions of
Subsection 10-3-704(1), (2), (3) or (4). Ordinances which do not have an
effective date shall become effective 20 days after publication or posting, or
30 days after final passage by the governing body, whichever is sooner.
